Missouri, session 2026, SB1604.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 321.310 and 321.330, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 321.310 and 321.330, to read as follows:
321.310. 1. Any owner of any real or personal
property contained within the boundaries of the district may
file with the board a petition praying that such property be
excluded and taken from the district. Such petition shall
describe the property which the petitioner desires to have
excluded, and must be acknowledged in the same manner and
form as required in case of a conveyance of land, and be
accompanied by a deposit of money sufficient to pay all
costs of the exclusion proceedings. The secretary of the
board shall cause a notice of filing of such petition to be
published in the county in which the property is located.
The notice shall state the filing of such petition, the name
of the petitioner, description of the property mentioned
sought to be excluded and the prayer of the petitioner; and
it shall notify all persons interested to appear at the
office of the board at the time named in the notice, showing
cause in writing, if any they have, why the petition should
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1604 2
not be granted. The board at the time and place mentioned
in the notice, or at the time or times at which the hearing
of the petition may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the
petition and all objections thereto presented in writing by
any person showing cause as aforesaid, why the prayer of the
petition should not be granted. The filing of such petition
shall be deemed and assent by the petitioner to the
exclusion from the district of the property mentioned in the
petition, or any part thereof.
2. Owners of individual parcels within a residential
subdivision contained within the boundaries of the district
may file with the board a petition praying that all real
property within the subdivision be excluded and taken from
the district. The petition shall:
(1) Be signed by every owner of a parcel within the
subdivision sought to be excluded, such signatures shall be
affixed before a person who shall certify, by affidavit
acknowledged before a notary public, that the signatures
were affixed in his or her presence;
(2) Describe the property that the petitioners desire
to have excluded, which description can be the name of the
residential subdivision and the plat book and page where
recorded;
(3) Include a statement from any rural, volunteer, or
subscription fire department or organization, volunteer fire
protection association, or municipality that such entity or
municipality will provide fire protection services to the
subdivision either directly or by contract with another fire
protection entity upon an order by the court excluding the
subdivision from the district issued under this section; and

SB 1604 3
(4) Be accompanied by a deposit of moneys sufficient
to pay all costs of the exclusion proceedings, which shall
be consolidated to the extent feasible.
The secretary of the board shall cause a notice of filing of
such petition to be published in the county in which the
subdivision is located. The notice shall state the filing
of such petition, the names of the petitioners, a
description of the property, the name of the fire
department, organization, or association that will provide
fire protection services if the petition is approved, and
the prayer of the petitioners. The secretary shall notify
all persons interested, including anyone who owns property
within the subdivision, to appear at the office of the board
at the time named in the notice, showing cause in writing,
if any they have, why the petition should not be granted.
The board at the time and place mentioned in the notice, or
at the time or times at which the hearing of the petition
may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the petition and all
objections thereto presented in writing by any person
showing cause as aforesaid why the prayer of the petition
should not be granted. The filing of such petition shall be
deemed to be assent by the petitioners to the exclusion from
the district of the property mentioned in the petition.
3. The board, if it deems it not for the best
interests of the district that the property mentioned in the
petition, or any portion thereof, shall be excluded from the
district, shall order that the petition be denied; but if it
determines that the property mentioned in the petition, or
any portion thereof, cannot as a practical matter be served
by the district or if it deems it for the best interest of
the district that the property mentioned in the petition, or

SB 1604 4
some portion thereof, be excluded from the district, then
the board may order the property mentioned in the petition,
or some portion thereof, excluded from the district. Upon
allowance of such petition, the board shall file a certified
copy of the order of the board making such change with the
circuit clerk. Upon order of the court, the property shall
be excluded from the district, and a copy of the order of
the board and the order of the court shall be filed with the
county clerk in each county in which the district lies. The
circuit court having jurisdiction over the district shall
make any such order excluding property from the district as
provided in the order of the board, unless the court shall
find that such order of the board was not authorized by law,
or that such order of the board was not supported by
competent and substantial evidence. Any person aggrieved by
any decision of the board made pursuant to the provisions of
this section may appeal that decision to the circuit court
within thirty days of the decision for a trial de novo.
321.330. 1. All real property included within, or
excluded from, a district shall thereafter be subject to the
levy of taxes for the payment of any indebtedness of the
district outstanding at the time of inclusion or exclusion[;
provided, however, that].
2. After any real property [shall have] has been
excluded from a district, as herein provided, any buildings
and improvements thereafter erected or constructed on said
excluded real property, and all machinery and equipment
thereafter installed or placed therein or thereon, and all
tangible personal property not in said district at the time
of the exclusion of said real property from said district
which shall thereafter be situate on or used in connection

SB 1604 5
with said real property, shall not be subject to any taxes
levied by said district.
3. Any real property excluded from a district under
subsection 2 of section 321.310 shall not be subject to the
provisions of subsection 1 of this section.
✓